Connecticut, session 2026, SB00496.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section,
2 (1) "hospital" has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-490 of
3 the general statutes, (2) "hospital financial assistance" means any
4 program administered by a hospital or health system, including a bed
5 fund, as defined in section 19a-509b of the general statutes, that reduces,
6 in whole or in part, a patient's liability for the cost of inpatient or
7 outpatient care, and (3) "hospital financial assistance program" means a
8 program in which a participating hospital provides inpatient and
9 outpatient care:
10 (A) At no cost to an uninsured patient with income not exceeding two
11 hundred per cent of the federal poverty level;
12 (B) Subsidized by hospital financial assistance for an uninsured
13 patient with income exceeding two hundred per cent of the federal
14 poverty level but not exceeding three hundred per cent of the federal
sSB496 / File No. 485 1

sSB496 File No. 485
15 poverty level;
16 (C) Subsidized with hospital financial assistance for any patient with
17 income not exceeding four hundred per cent of the federal poverty level
18 who is enrolled in (i) the federal supplemental nutrition assistance
19 program, or (ii) the federal Special Supplemental Food Program for
20 Women, Infants and Children; and
21 (D) For patients with household income under two hundred per cent
22 of the federal poverty level who are deemed ineligible for hospital
23 financial assistance, billed in accordance with a payment schedule
24 amounting to not more than two per cent of such patient's annual
25 household income per year. After a cumulative thirty-six months of
26 payments by such patient, each participating hospital shall consider the
27 patient's hospital bill paid in full and permanently cease any and all
28 collection activities on any balance that remains unpaid.
29 (b) A hospital may opt in to the hospital financial assistance program
30 and be reimbursed pursuant to section 2 of this act. A participating
31 hospital shall not (1) count a patient's assets when determining
32 eligibility for hospital financial assistance, or (2) require the patient to
33 provide proof that the patient's application for benefits under the state
34 medical assistance program, Medicare, Emergency Medicaid, other
35 government-funded coverage or insurance through the Connecticut
36 Health Insurance Exchange was denied. A hospital shall use software
37 that conforms to industry standards concerning electronic income
38 verification and may accept one of the following documents to verify
39 income:
40 (A) A copy of the patient's most recent tax return;
41 (B) A copy of the patient's most recent W-2 form and 1099 forms;
42 (C) Copies of the patient's two most recent pay stubs; or
43 (D) Written income verification from an employer if the patient is
44 paid in cash.
sSB496 / File No. 485 2

sSB496 File No. 485
45 (c) A participating hospital shall exempt patients who are
46 experiencing homelessness or are at imminent risk of homelessness
47 from providing documentation pursuant to subsection (b) of this section
48 but may require such patients to provide self-attested information for
49 both a hospital financial assistance screening and hospital financial
50 assistance application.
51 (d) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 19a-509b of the general
52 statutes, a participating hospital shall make information available on the
53 hospital financial assistance program in each of the top non-English
54 languages spoken by five or more per cent of the population that reside
55 in the geographic area served by the hospital. Such information shall (1)
56 be included in all discharge paperwork and on the hospital's Internet
57 web site, (2) contain contact information for the Office of the Health Care
58 Advocate, and (3) comply with requirements concerning effective
59 communications under the Americans with Disabilities Act, including,
60 but not limited to, communications delivered through relay services,
61 interpretation, large print and braille.
62 Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section,
63 "disproportionate share hospital payment" means a Medicaid payment
64 to a hospital that serves a disproportionately large number of Medicaid
65 beneficiaries and uninsured individuals. The Commissioner of Social
66 Services shall amend the Medicaid state plan to use disproportionate
67 share hospital payments to compensate hospitals that participate in the
68 hospital financial assistance program established pursuant to section 1
69 of this act.
70 (b) The Commissioner of Social Services shall establish criteria for a
71 participating hospital to document hospital financial assistance and
72 receive timely payment for such assistance.
73 (c) A hospital aggrieved by a final decision by the commissioner on
74 the validity of such hospital's bills for hospital financial assistance may
75 file an appeal in accordance with the provisions of section 17b-238 of the
76 general statutes, as amended by this act.
sSB496 / File No. 485 3

sSB496 File No. 485
77 Sec. 3. Subsection (b) of section 17b-238 of the 2026 supplement to the
78 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
79 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
80 (b) Any institution or agency to which payments are to be made
81 under sections 17b-239 to 17b-246, inclusive, and sections 17b-340, [and]
82 17b-343 and section 2 of this act which is aggrieved by any decision of
83 said commissioner may, within ten days after written notice thereof
84 from the commissioner, obtain, by written request to the commissioner,
85 a rehearing on all items of aggrievement. On and after July 1, 1996, a
86 rehearing shall be held by the commissioner or his designee, provided a
87 detailed written description of all such items is filed within ninety days
88 of written notice of the commissioner's decision. The rehearing shall be
89 held within thirty days of the filing of the detailed written description
90 of each specific item of aggrievement. The commissioner shall issue a
91 final decision within sixty days of the close of evidence or the date on
92 which final briefs are filed, whichever occurs later. Any designee of the
93 commissioner who presides over such rehearing shall be impartial and
94 shall not be employed within the Department of Social Services office of
95 certificate of need and rate setting. Any such items not resolved at such
96 rehearing to the satisfaction of either such institution or agency or said
97 commissioner shall be submitted to binding arbitration to an arbitration
98 board consisting of one member appointed by the institution or agency,
99 one member appointed by the commissioner and one member
100 appointed by the Chief Court Administrator from among the retired
101 judges of the Superior Court, which retired judge shall be compensated
102 for his services on such board in the same manner as a state referee is
103 compensated for his services under section 52-434. The proceedings of
104 the arbitration board and any decisions rendered by such board shall be
105 conducted in accordance with the provisions of the Social Security Act,
106 49 Stat. 620 (1935), 42 USC 1396, as amended from time to time, and
107 chapter 54.
108 Sec. 4. Subsection (b) of section 17b-238 of the 2026 supplement to the
109 general statutes, as amended by section 348 of public act 25-168, is
110 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January
sSB496 / File No. 485 4

sSB496 File No. 485
111 1, 2027):
112 (b) Any institution or agency to which payments are to be made
113 under sections 17b-239 to 17b-246, inclusive, and sections 17b-340, [and]
114 17b-343 and section 2 of this act which is aggrieved by any decision of
115 said commissioner may, within ten days after written notice thereof
116 from the commissioner, obtain, by written request to the commissioner,
117 a rehearing on all items of aggrievement. On and after July 1, 1996, a
118 rehearing shall be held by the commissioner or his designee, provided a
119 detailed written description of all such items is filed within ninety days
120 of written notice of the commissioner's decision. The rehearing shall be
121 held within thirty days of the filing of the detailed written description
122 of each specific item of aggrievement. The commissioner shall issue a
123 final decision within sixty days of the close of evidence or the date on
124 which final briefs are filed, whichever occurs later. Any designee of the
125 commissioner who presides over such rehearing shall be impartial and
126 shall not be employed within the Department of Social Services office of
127 certificate of need and rate setting. Any such items not resolved at such
128 rehearing to the satisfaction of either such institution or agency or said
129 commissioner may be appealed in accordance with section 4-183. Such
130 appeals shall be privileged cases to be heard by the court as soon after
131 the return date as shall be practicable.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 17b-238(b)
Sec. 4 January 1, 2027 17b-238(b)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
Sections 1(b)(2) and (c) were redrafted for clarity; in Section 2(c), "17b-
60" was changed to "17b-238" for accuracy; and Sections 3 and 4 were
added for accuracy and statutory consistency.
HS Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB496 / File No. 485 5

sSB496 File No. 485
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
UConn Health Ctr. GF - Potential See Below See Below
Revenue Gain
Social Services, Dept. GF - Cost See Below See Below
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
Section 1 results in a potential revenue gain to the UConn Health
Center (UCHC) annually beginning in FY 27. It allows any hospital,
including UCHC, to participate in a financial assistance program
established by the bill for patients who meet certain income and other
criteria. Presumably, UCHC would only choose to participate if the
program increased net patient revenue, and the bill's reimbursement
from DSS offset the cost of participating in this program. Any revenue
gain would depend on: (1) the number of qualifying patients who
participate; and (2) how the program's changes in qualifying patient
payments compare to the reimbursement UCHC would receive from
DSS.
In the past 12 months, UConn Health has served at least 5,299
uninsured patients and 749 insured patients who met the bill's income
parameters.1 On average, the uninsured patients who met the bill's
1 These numbers represent the number of insured and uninsured patients at UCHC
who have applied for financial assistance in the past 12 months and otherwise meet
the bill's eligibility parameters. These figures do not include patients who may be
eligible to participate in the bill's financial assistance program due to participation in
SNAP or WIC.
sSB496 / File No. 485 6

sSB496 File No. 485
income parameters owed $810 out-of-pocket, and they ultimately paid
63% to 72% of that amount (i.e., $227 to $300 is left unpaid). The insured
patients owed $301, and they ultimately paid 69% to 81% of that amount
(i.e., $57 to $93 left unpaid).
Section 2 results in a Medicaid cost to the Department of Social
Services (DSS) associated with disproportionate share hospital
payments (DSH). The bill requires DSS to make DSH payments to
hospitals as compensation for participating in the hospital financial
assistance program established by the bill, using criteria to be identified
by DSS. The extent of the cost to DSS is unknown and will be based on
participating hospitals, criteria developed, and relevant costs. For
context, DSH payments must meet federal requirements in order for
states to receive a 50% federal share and are subject to both hospital and
state specific limits.
DSS may also incur increased administrative costs to the extent
participating hospitals utilize the appeals process authorized by the bill.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the scope of allowable DSH payments.
sSB496 / File No. 485 7

sSB496 File No. 485
OLR Bill Analysis
sSB 496
AN ACT CONCERNING HOSPITAL UNCOMPENSATED CARE.